Illinois, session 104th, HB54.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Commemorative Dates Act is amended by 5adding Section 173 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 490/173 new)7    Sec. 173. Soil Health Week. The first full week of March 8each year is designated as Soil Health Week to be observed 9throughout the State as a week to celebrate and raise 10awareness for the importance of soil health to Illinois 11agriculture and in recognition of family farmers. 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.